Washington statutes.
RCW 41.72.010

Law enforcement medal of honor established.

There is established a decoration of the state law enforcement medal of honor with accompanying ribbons and appurtenances for award by the governor in the name of the state to any law enforcement officer who has been seriously injured or killed while in the performance of duty, or who has been distinguished by exceptionally meritorious conduct, upon nomination of the governor's state law enforcement medal of honor committee.

[ 1994 c 89 s 1.]